Illinois, session 104th, SB3253.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Section 7-41 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/7-41)  (from Ch. 46, par. 7-41)7    Sec. 7-41. (a) All officers upon whom is imposed by law the 8duty of designating and providing polling places for general 9elections, shall provide in each such polling place so 10designated and provided, a sufficient number of booths for 11such primary election, which booths shall be provided with 12shelves, such supplies and pencils as will enable the voter to 13prepare his ballot for voting and in which voters may prepare 14their ballots screened from all observation as to the manner 15in which they do so. Such booths shall be within plain view of 16the election officers and both they and the ballot boxes shall 17be within plain view of those within the proximity of the 18voting booths. No person other than election officers and the 19challengers allowed by law and those admitted for the purpose 20of voting, as hereinafter provided, shall be permitted within 21the proximity of the voting booths, except by authority of the 22primary officers to keep order and enforce the law.23    (b) The number of such voting booths shall not be less than   SB3253- 2 -LRB104 20407 SPS 33869 b1one to every seventy-five voters or fraction thereof, who 2voted at the last preceding election in the precinct or 3election district.4    (c) No person shall do any electioneering or soliciting of 5votes on primary day within any polling place or within one 6hundred feet of any polling place, or, at the option of a 7church or private school, on any of the property of that church 8or private school that is a polling place. Election officers 9shall place 2 or more cones, small United States national 10flags, or some other marker a distance of 100 horizontal feet 11from each entrance to the room used by voters to engage in 12voting, which shall be known as the polling room. If the 13polling room is located within a building that is a private 14business, a public or private school, or a church or other 15organization founded for the purpose of religious worship and 16the distance of 100 horizontal feet ends within the interior 17of the building, then the markers shall be placed outside of 18the building at each entrance used by voters to enter that 19building on the grounds adjacent to the thoroughfare or 20walkway. If the polling room is located within a public or 21private building with 2 or more floors and the polling room is 22located on the ground floor, then the markers shall be placed 23100 horizontal feet from each entrance to the polling room 24used by voters to engage in voting. If the polling room is 25located in a public or private building with 2 or more floors 26and the polling room is located on a floor above or below the   SB3253- 3 -LRB104 20407 SPS 33869 b1ground floor, then the markers shall be placed a distance of 2100 feet from the nearest elevator or staircase used by voters 3on the ground floor to access the floor where the polling room 4is located. The area within where the markers are placed shall 5be known as a campaign free zone, and electioneering is 6prohibited pursuant to this subsection. Notwithstanding any 7other provision of this Section, a church or private school 8may choose to apply the campaign free zone to its entire 9property, and, if so, the markers shall be placed near the 10boundaries on the grounds adjacent to the thoroughfares or 11walkways leading to the entrances used by the voters. At or 12near the door of each polling place, the election judges shall 13place signage indicating the proper entrance to the polling 14place. In addition, the election judges shall ensure that a 15sign identifying the location of the polling place is placed 16on a nearby public roadway. Notwithstanding any other 17provision of this Section, the campaign free zone at any 18polling place located within any forest preserve district or 19conservation district shall extend 100 horizontal feet from 20each entrance to the room used by voters to engage in voting 21and shall also extend 500 horizontal feet from each entrance 22to the room used by voters to engage in voting to the 23boundaries of the district, except that the campaign free zone 24shall not include any private property located within the 25boundaries of the forest preserve district or conservation 26district. The State Board of Elections shall establish   SB3253- 4 -LRB104 20407 SPS 33869 b1guidelines for the placement of polling place signage. 2    The area on polling place property beyond the campaign 3free zone, whether publicly or privately owned, is a public 4forum for the time that the polls are open on an election day. 5At the request of election officers any publicly owned 6building must be made available for use as a polling place. A 7person shall have the right to congregate and engage in 8electioneering on any polling place property while the polls 9are open beyond the campaign free zone, including but not 10limited to, the placement of temporary signs. This subsection 11shall be construed liberally in favor of persons engaging in 12electioneering on all polling place property beyond the 13campaign free zone for the time that the polls are open on an 14election day.15    (d) The regulation of electioneering on polling place 16property on an election day, including but not limited to the 17placement of temporary signs, is an exclusive power and 18function of the State. A home rule unit may not regulate 19electioneering and any ordinance or local law contrary to 20subsection (c) is declared void. This is a denial and 21limitation of home rule powers and functions under subsection 22(h) of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution.23(Source: P.A. 95-699, eff. 11-9-07.)